Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 3. Support of Spouse and Care of Children

§ 291.
When a married person deserts or fails to support his or her spouse.

When a married person without just cause fails to furnish suitable support for that person’s spouse, or has deserted such spouse, or when a married person, for a justifiable cause, is actually living apart from such spouse, on the complaint of either married person, or, if the deserted spouse has a mental condition or psychiatric disability, on the complaint of a guardian or next friend, the Superior Court, by its order, may prohibit either spouse from imposing restraint on the other’s personal liberty for such time as the court in such order directs, or until further order.

Upon the application of the husband or wife, or of the guardian or next friend of either spouse, such court may make such orders as it deems expedient concerning the support of either spouse and the care, custody, education, and maintenance of the minor children of the parties. It may determine with which of the parents the children, or any of them, shall remain, and thereafter, from time to time, on similar application, may revise and alter such order, or make a new order or decree, as the case requires.

The complaint may be brought in the county in which either of the parties resides, except that, if the complainant has left the county in which the parties have lived together, the adverse party still residing therein, the complaint shall be brought in that county.

When complaint is made as provided in this section, a summons shall be issued to the other party directing him or her to cause his or her appearance therein to be entered not later than 21 days after the date of the service thereof and show cause why the prayer of the complaint should not be granted, which summons and the complaint shall be served on such party as provided by section 596 of this title.

After filing such complaint the Superior Court in which the cause is pending, or a Superior judge, on application of either party, may make such order concerning the care and custody of such minor children, or the support of either spouse, during the pendency of the complaint, as is deemed expedient and for the benefit of either spouse or the children.

When filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of a town, or served upon a private corporation, such order shall be a lien upon such of the real estate and personal property of the defendant in such town, and upon the stock of the defendant in such corporation as is mentioned in the order.

For the purposes of this section, “children” shall include stepchildren.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 98

, § 2, eff. April 22, 1971;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 66.

§ 292.
Repealed.
1981, No. 247 (Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 293.
When parents live separately.

When parents of minor children, or parents and stepparents of minor children, whether said parents are married or unmarried, are living separately, on the complaint of either parent or stepparent or, if it is a party in interest, the Department for Children and Families, the Family Division of the Superior Court may make such decree concerning parental rights and responsibilities and parent-child contact (as defined in section 664 of this title), and the support of the children, as in cases where either parent deserts or without just cause fails to support. Thereafter on the motion of either of the parents, the stepparent, or the Department for Children and Families, the court may annul, vary or modify the decrees.

Any legal presumption of parentage as set forth in section 308 of this title shall be sufficient basis for initiating a support action under this section without any further proceedings to establish parentage. If a party raises an objection to the presumption, the court may determine the issue of parentage as part of the support action. If no written objection to the presumption is raised, an order under this section shall constitute a judgment on the issue of parentage.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 98

, § 3, eff. April 22, 1971;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3 eff. April 9, 1974;

1993, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 294.
Man in the house.

When the mother of minor children is residing within the same household as a man unrelated to her and not otherwise liable for the support of the mother and her children, on the complaint of the mother or, if she is receiving public assistance, the Department for Children and Families, the Superior Court shall make such decree concerning the support of the mother and the care, custody, maintenance, and education of the children as in cases where the husband refuses without just cause to support his wife and children. The decree shall by its terms continue in force for so long as the defendant resides within the household or until further order of the court.

This section shall not apply to persons living in boarding houses.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 98

, § 4, eff. April 22, 1971; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 295.
Substitute husband and father.

When complaint is made under section 292, 293 or 294 of this title, a summons shall be issued to the other party directing him to cause his appearance therein to be entered not later than 21 days after the date of the service thereof and show cause why the prayer of the complaint should not be granted, which summons and the complaint shall be served on such party as provided by section 596 or by section 597 of this title. After the filing of such complaint, the Superior Court in which the cause is pending, or any Superior judge, may, on application of either party make such order concerning the care and custody of the minor children during the pendency of the complaint, as is deemed expedient and for the benefit of such children.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 98

, § 5, eff. April 22, 1971;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 296.
Liability of stepparents.

A stepparent has a duty to support a stepchild if they reside in the same household and if the financial resources of the natural or adoptive parents are insufficient to provide the child with a reasonable subsistence consistent with decency and health.
The duty of a stepparent to support a stepchild under this section shall be coextensive with and enforceable according to the same terms as the duty of a natural or adoptive parent to support a natural or adoptive child including any such duty of support as exists under the common law of this State, for so long as the marital bond creating the step relationship shall continue.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 7, 1972; amended

1985, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 1, 1987.